apertium-fkv-fin.fkv.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

! POS
%<n%>      ! Noun
%<np%>     ! Proper noun
%<vblex%>  ! Verb
%<vaux%>   ! Auxliary verb
%<adj%>    ! Adjective
%<adv%>    ! Adverb
%<pr%>     ! Adposition
%<cnjcoo%> ! Co-ordinating conjunction
%<cnjsub%> ! Sub-ordinating conjunction
%<num%>    ! Numeral


! Number
%<sg%>  ! Singular
%<pl%>  ! Plural

! Person
%<p1%>  ! First
%<p2%>  ! Second
%<p3%>  ! Third

! Person related
%<ant%>  ! Anthroponym (name of a person)
%<pers%> ! Personal (for pronouns)
%<mf%>   ! Masculin or feminin
%<m%>    ! Masculin
%<f%>    ! Feminin
%<nt%>   ! Neuter

! For vowel harmony
%{A%}   ! {A} = a or ä
%{U%}   ! {U} = u or y

! Cases
%<nom%> ! Nominative
%<acc%> ! Accusative
%<par%> ! Partitive
%<gen%> ! Genitive
%<ine%> ! Inessive
%<ela%> ! Elative
%<ill%> ! Illative
%<ade%> ! Adessive
%<abl%> ! Ablative
%<all%> ! Ellative
%<ins%> ! Instructive
%<tra%> ! Translative
%<abe%> ! Abessive
%<com%> ! Comitative

! Verb symbols
%<inf%>  ! Infinitive
%<actv%> ! Active voice
%<pasv%> ! Passive voice
%<pres%> ! Present
%<past%> ! Past
%<conneg%> ! Part of negation

! Punctuation
%<sent%>      ! Sentence marker
%<guio%>      ! Hyphen
%<cm%>        ! Comma
%<apos%>      ! Apostrophe
%<rquot%>     ! Quote marker (right hand side)
%<lquot%>     ! Quote marker (left hand side)
%<rpar%>      ! Parenthetical marker (right hand side)
%<lpar%>      ! Parenthetical marker (left hand side)


LEXICON Root

Nouns ;
Verbs ;
Adjectives ;
Adverbs ;
Pronouns ;
Conjunctions ;
Adpositions ;
Other ;
ProperNouns ;
Numerals ;
Punctuation ;


LEXICON Clitics
ki%<clitic%>:ki # ; ! "kin"
haan%<clitic%>:h%{A%}%{A%}n # ; ! "hAn"
pa%<clitic%>:p%{A%}%{A%} # ; ! "pA"
# ;


LEXICON O1
%<other%>: Clitics ;

LEXICON Other
enhään O1 ; ! "enää"
niin O1 ; ! "niin"
kiini O1 ; ! "kiinni"
aivan O1 ; ! "aivan"
kauvas O1 ; ! "kauas"


LEXICON CC

%<cnjcoo%>: # ;

LEXICON Conjunctions
ja%<cnjcoo%>:ja # ;
tahi%<cnjcoo%>:tahi # ;

ette%<cnjsub%>:ette # ; ! "that"
jos%<cnjsub%>:jos # ; ! "if"
ko%<cnjsub%>:ko # ; ! "?"
mutta%<cnjsub%>:mutta # ; ! "but"
vaikka%<cnjsub%>:vaikka # ; ! "even though"

joka CC ; ! "joka"
jokka CC ; ! "jotka"
jotta CC ; ! "jotta"
kunnes CC ; ! "kunnes"
mikä CC ; ! "mikä"
millä CC ; ! "millä"
niin CC ; ! "niin"
vaan CC ; ! "vaan"

LEXICON PP

%<pr%>: # ;

! Really just all appositions and leftovers
LEXICON Adpositions

alla PP ; ! "alla"
eđestä PP ; ! "edestä"
jälkhiin PP ; ! "jälkeen"
kans PP ; ! "kanssa"
keskelä PP ; ! "keskellä"
kohti PP ; ! "kohti"
likelä PP ; ! "lähellä"
läpi PP ; ! "läpi"
mukhaan PP ; ! "mukaan"
myöten PP ; ! "myöten"
päälä PP ; ! "päällä
sisälä PP ; ! "sisällä"
taka PP ; ! "takaa"
takana PP ; ! "takana"
takkaa PP ; ! "takaa"
tykö PP ; ! "luokse"
tykönä PP ; ! "luona"
tähđen PP ; ! "takia"
yli PP ; ! "yli"
ylös PP ; ! "ylös"
! better place?
ko PP ; ! "kuin";

!
! Paradigms for pronouns
!

LEXICON P_MIE
%<nom%>:e Clitics ;
%<gen%>:nun Clitics ;
%<par%>:nnuu Clitics ;
%<all%>:nule Clitics ;

LEXICON P_SE
%<nom%>:se Clitics ;
%<gen%>:sen Clitics ;
%<par%>:sitä Clitics ;
%<ade%>:sillä Clitics ;
%<all%>:sille Clitics ;
%<abl%>:siltä Clitics ;
%<ill%>:siihen Clitics ;

LEXICON P_MET
%<nom%>:t Clitics ;
%<gen%>:iđän Clitics ;
%<ade%>:ilä Clitics ;

LEXICON P_HÄN
%<nom%>: Clitics ;
%<par%>:tä Clitics ;
%<gen%>:en Clitics ;
%<ade%>:elä Clitics ;

LEXICON P_TÄMÄ
%<nom%>:mä Clitics ;
%<gen%>:män Clitics ;

LEXICON ADV

%<adv%>: # ;


!
! Paradigms for nouns
!

! Generic noun until inflection is figured
LEXICON N1
%<n%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: # ;

LEXICON N3

%<n%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:%{A%} # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<par%>:%{A%}t%{A%} # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:%{A%}n # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<all%>:%{A%}le # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<ess%>:%{A%}n%{A%} # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<ill%>:ihin # ;

LEXICON N_PUU
%<n%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:%{U%} # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<par%>:%{U%}t%{A%} # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:%{U%}n # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<all%>:%{U%}le # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<ess%>:%{U%}n%{A%} # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<ill%>:ihin # ;

LEXICON N4

%<n%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ta # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<par%>:ttaa # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<ill%>:thaan # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<ela%>:nasta # ;

LEXICON N6

%<n%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:et # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<par%>:hettä # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<ela%>:heestä # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<ade%>:heelä # ;

! Regular nounds ending in vowel
LEXICON N7
%<n%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<par%>:%{A%} # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:n # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<tra%>:ksi # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<ess%>:n%{A%} # ;

%<n%>%<sg%>%<ela%>:st%{A%} # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:lt%{A%} # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<ela%>:st%{A%} # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<ine%>:ss%{A%} # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<all%>:le # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<ade%>:l%{A%} # ;
%<n%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:t # ;
%<n%>%<pl%>%<ela%>:ist%{A%} # ;
%<n%>%<pl%>%<abl%>:ilt%{A%} # ;
%<n%>%<pl%>%<ine%>:iss%{A%} # ;
%<n%>%<pl%>%<all%>:ile # ;
%<n%>%<pl%>%<ade%>:il%{A%} # ;

! Regular words ending in consonant
LEXICON N_NIKLAS
%<sg%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<sg%>%<par%>:i%{A%} # ;
%<sg%>%<gen%>:in # ;
%<sg%>%<tra%>:iksi # ;
%<sg%>%<ess%>:in%{A%} # ;
%<sg%>%<ela%>:ist%{A%} # ;
%<sg%>%<abl%>:ilt%{A%} # ;
%<sg%>%<ela%>:ist%{A%} # ;
%<sg%>%<ine%>:iss%{A%} # ;
%<sg%>%<all%>:ile # ;
%<sg%>%<ade%>:il%{A%} # ;
%<pl%>%<nom%>:it # ;
%<pl%>%<ela%>:eist%{A%} # ;
%<pl%>%<abl%>:eilt%{A%} # ;
%<pl%>%<ine%>:eiss%{A%} # ;
%<pl%>%<all%>:eile # ;
%<pl%>%<ade%>:eil%{A%} # ;

LEXICON N7a

%<n%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:a # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<ela%>:asta # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:alta # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<ine%>:assa # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<par%>:aa # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<all%>:ale # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<ade%>:ala # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:an # ;
%<n%>%<pl%>%<par%>:oi # ;
%<n%>%<pl%>%<all%>:oile # ;
%<n%>%<pl%>%<ela%>:oista # ;

LEXICON N_SUUNTA
%<n%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ta # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<ela%>:nasta # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:nalta # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<ine%>:taan # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<par%>:taa # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<all%>:ale # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<ade%>:ala # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:an # ;


LEXICON N8

%<n%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<par%>:o # ;
%<n%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:t # ;
%<n%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:in # ; ! ?
%<n%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:n # ;
%<n%>%<pl%>%<ade%>:ila # ;

LEXICON N9

%<n%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:s # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<ess%>:henä # ;

LEXICON N10

%<n%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:nen # ;
%<n%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:set # ;

LEXICON N11

%<n%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ta # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<ade%>:lala # ;

LEXICON N12

%<n%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ka # ;
%<n%>%<pl%>%<all%>:oile # ;

LEXICON N13

%<n%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:si # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<ade%>:đelä # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<ine%>:đessä # ;
%<n%>%<pl%>%<ade%>:silä # ;

LEXICON N14

%<n%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:s # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ksen # ;

LEXICON N15

%<n%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:a # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<par%>:aa # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:haan # ;

LEXICON N16

%<n%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:i # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<ill%>:hiin # ;

LEXICON N17

%<n%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:si # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<par%>:tta # ;

LEXICON N18

%<n%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:a # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<par%>:kaa # ;

LEXICON N19

%<n%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:i # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<par%>:t%{A%} # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:en # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<ine%>:ess%{A%} # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<ela%>:est%{A%} # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<ade%>:el%{A%} # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<all%>:ele # ;

LEXICON N20
%<n%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:vesi # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<par%>:vettä # ;

LEXICON N_AIKA
%<n%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:aika # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:aijan # ;

!
! Paradigms for verbs
!

LEXICON V_OLLA
%<inf%>:olla # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<conneg%>:ole # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<inf%>%<sg%>%<ill%>:olemhaan # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:olen # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:on # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:olin # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:oli # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:olima # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:olthiin # ;
%<actv%>%<pp%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ollu # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>%<sg%>%<conneg%>:ollu # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>%<pl%>%<conneg%>:olheet # ;

LEXICON V_TULLA
%<inf%>:la # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<inf%>%<sg%>%<ill%>:emhaan # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:en # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:ee # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:in # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:i # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:im%{A%} # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:thiin # ;
%<actv%>%<pp%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:lu # ;

LEXICON V_ASETTUA
%<inf%>:uut # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:tui # ;

LEXICON Nouns
aika: N_AIKA ; ! "time"
faari N7 ; ! "vaari"
fierva N7 ; ! "ebb"
hietta:hiett N7a ; ! "hiekka"
hilla:hill N7a ; ! "hilla"
histooria N8 ; ! "historia"
hytä N7 ; ! "tupa"
ihminen:ihmi N10 ; ! "ihminen"
ilma:ilm N7a ; ! "ilma"
ilta:il N11 ; ! "ilta"
jalka:jal N12 ; ! "jalka"
kauhu N7 ; ! "kauhu"
kauppias N1 ; ! "kauppias"
kesä N1 ; ! "kesä"
kolmasosa N7 ; ! "kolmasosa"
koppa N4 ; ! "koppa?"
koti:kot N16 ; ! "koti"
käsi:kä N13 ; ! "käsi"
linja N7 ; ! "linja"
luppaus:luppau N14 ; ! "lupaus"
maa:ma N3 ; ! "maa"
maarieppa N1 ; ! "landlubber"
marja:marj N7a ; ! "marja"
matka:matk N7a ; ! "matka"
meri:mer N19 ; ! "meri"
mieli:miel N19 ; ! "mieli"
ulkopuoli:ulkopuol N19 ; ! "ulkopuoli"
miila:miil N7a ; ! "maili"
morssii N1 ; ! "morsian"
niemi:niem N19 ; ! "niemi"
paaro N8 ; ! "aalto"
vuono N8 ; ! "vuono"
pimmeys N1 ; ! "pimeys"
pohja N7 ; ! "pohja"
purjetmies:purjetmie N9 ; ! "??"
ranta:ran N4 ; ! "ranta"
ruoka:ruok N18 ; ! "ruoka"
ruori N7 ; ! "ruori"
saari:saar N19 ; ! "saari"
seppä N7 ; ! "seppä"
silloinen:silloi N10 ; ! "silloinen"
sneeseili N7 ; ! "sneeseili"
suoja:suoj N15 ; ! "suoja"
suora N1 ; ! "suora"
suunta N_SUUNTA ; ! "suunta"
systeemi N7 ; ! "systeemi"
syy:sy N_PUU ; ! "syy"
sää:sä N3 ; ! "sää"
tunturi:tuntur N16 ; ! "tunturi"
tuuli:tuul N19 ; ! "tuuli"
vaimo N7 ; ! "vaimo"
velipuoli:velipuol N19 ; ! "velipuoli"
venet:ven N6 ; ! "vene"
vesi: N20 ; ! "vesi"
vuosi:vuo N17 ; ! "vuosi"
